pt-PT: Tamanho da mesa: 10 pés; 4 pés; 5 pés; 6 ft; 6,5 pés; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Outro
fr: Taille de la table: 10 pi; 4 pi; 5 pi; 6 pi; 6,5 pi; 7 pi; 7,5 pi; 8 pi; 8,5 pi; 9 pi; Autre
de: Tischgröße: 10 Fuß; 4 Fuß; 5 Fuß; 6 ft; 6,5 Fuß; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Sonstige
nb: Bordstørrelse: 10 fot; 4 fot; 5 fot; 6 fot; 6,5 fot; 7 fot; 7,5 fot; 8 fot; 8,5 fot; 9 fot; Annet
sl-SI: Velikost mize: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Drugo
it: Misura del tavolo: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 piedi; 6,5 ft; 7 piedi; 7,5 piedi; 8 piedi; 8,5 piedi; 9 piedi; Altro
el: Πίνακας μεγέθους: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Άλλο
pl: Wielkość stołu: 10 stóp; 4 stopy; 5 stóp; 6 ft; 6,5 stopy; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Inne
cs: Velikost stolu: 10 stop; 4 stopy; 5 stop; 6 ft; 6,5 stopy; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Jiné
hu: Asztal mérete: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Egyéb
lt-LT: Stalo dydis: 10 pėd.; 4 pėd.; 5 pėd.; 6 pėd.; 6,5 pėd.; 7 pėd.; 7,5 pėd.; 8 pėd.; 8,5 pėd.; 9 pėd.; Kita
sv: Bordstorlek: 10 fot; 4 fot; 5 fot; 6 ft; 6,5 fot; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Annat
ru: Размер стола: 10 футов; 4 фута; 5 футов; 6 футов; 6,5 футов; 7 футов; 7,5 фута; 8 футов; 8,5 фута; 9 футов; Другое
fi: Pöydän koko: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 jalkaa; 6,5 ft; 7 jalkaa; 7,5 jalkaa; 8 jalkaa; 8,5 jalkaa; 9 jalkaa; Muu
ro-RO: Dimensiunea mesei de biliard: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Altele
th: ขนาดโต๊ะ: 10 ฟุต; 4 ฟุต; 5 ฟุต; 6 ฟุต; 6.5 ฟุต; 7 ฟุต; 7.5 ฟุต; 8 ฟุต; 8.5 ฟุต; 9 ฟุต; อื่นๆ
vi: Kích thước bàn: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Khác
en: Table size: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 ft; 6.5 ft; 7 ft; 7.5 ft; 8 ft; 8.5 ft; 9 ft; Other
hr-HR: Veličina stola: 10 stopa; 4 stope; 5 stopa; 6 stopa; 6,5 stopa; 7 stopa; 7,5 stopa; 8 stopa; 8,5 stopa; 9 stopa; Ostalo
ja: テーブルサイズ: 10フィート; 4フィート; 5フィート; 6 ft; 6.5フィート; 7 ft; 7.5 ft; 8 ft; 8.5 ft; 9 ft; その他
es: Tamaño de la mesa: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 pies; 6.5 ft; 7 pies; 7,5 pies; 8 pies; 8,5 pies; 9 pies; Otro
zh-TW: 桌子尺寸: 10 呎; 4 呎; 5 呎; 6 呎; 6.5 呎; 7 呎; 7.5 呎; 8 呎; 8.5 呎; 9 呎; 其他
nl: Tafelmaat: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7.5 ft; 8 ft; 8.5 ft; 9 ft; Overig
sk-SK: Veľkosť stola: 10 stôp; 4 stopy; 5 stôp; 6 stôp; 6,5 stopy; 7 stôp; 7,5 stopy; 8 stôp; 8,5 stopy; 9 stôp; Iná
pt-BR: Mesa tamanho: 10 pés; 4 pés; 5 pés; 6 pés; 6,5 pés; 7 pés; 7,5 pés; 8 pés; 8,5 pés; 9 pés; Outro
da: Bordstørrelse: 10 fod; 4 fod; 5 fod; 6 fod; 6,5 fod; 7 fod; 7,5 fod; 8 fod; 8,5 fod; 9 fod; Andet
zh-CN: 球桌尺寸: 10 英尺; 4 英尺; 5 英尺; 6 英尺; 6.5 英尺; 7 英尺; 7.5 英尺; 8 英尺; 8.5 英尺; 9 英尺; 其他
ko: 당구대 사이즈: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6피트; 6.5 ft; 7피트; 7.5피트; 8피트; 8.5피트; 9피트; 기타
tr: Masa boyutu: 10 ft; 4 ft; 5 ft; 6 ft; 6,5 ft; 7 ft; 7,5 ft; 8 ft; 8,5 ft; 9 ft; Diğer
bg-BG: Размер на таблицата: 10 фута; 4 фута; 5 фута; 6 фута; 6,5 фута; 7 фута; 7,5 фута; 8 фута; 8,5 фута; 9 фута; Друго